Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 61
OIL WELLS AND BOREHOLES

Section

34-61-101. Boreholes penetrating coal seams.

It is the duty of the owner, or person in charge of any borehole which penetrates any workable coal seam or any accessible or inaccessible coal mine excavation, to notify the state oil and gas conservation commission of the location of such borehole by designating the particular five-acre subdivision of the land section on which such borehole is situated, and the depth and thickness of every workable coal seam or accessible or inaccessible coal mine excavation penetrated by such borehole. On receipt of such notification, the state oil and gas conservation commission shall at once notify the chief inspector of coal mines.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 373, § 28.

C.L.

§ 3641.

CSA:

C. 118, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-1.

34-61-102. Location of borehole restricted.

No borehole penetrating a gas-bearing or oil-bearing formation shall be located within two hundred feet of a shaft or entrance to a coal mine not definitely abandoned or sealed. No such borehole shall be located within one hundred feet of any mine shaft house, mine boiler house, mine engine house, or mine fan. The location of any proposed borehole must insure that when drilled it will be at least fifteen feet from any mine haulage or airway.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 375, § 32.

C.L.

§ 3645.

CSA:

C. 118, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-2.

34-61-103. Casing of borehole penetrating coal.

Any borehole penetrating any workable seam of coal shall be cased by the owner of such borehole with a suitable casing, conductor, or drive pipe, so as to shut off all surface water from entering said workable coal seam.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 375, § 33.

C.L.

§ 3646.

CSA:

C. 118, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-3.

34-61-104. Oil or gas entering coal seams.

When boreholes for gas or oil are drilled in the coal measures and pass through workable seams, if gas or oil is encountered in such borehole, the coal seams or worked out coal seams shall be sufficiently protected by casing so that the gas or oil shall not come in contact with the coal seams or enter the excavations of worked out seams. When no oil or gas is located and the borehole has been abandoned, a solid cement plug shall be placed extending from fifty feet below each coal seam to fifty feet above the top of each coal seam and at the surface to a depth of twenty feet.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 376, § 34.

C.L.

§ 3647.

CSA:

C. 118, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-4.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1571, § 1, effective June 1.

34-61-105. Casing to exclude water.

When a water-bearing formation is encountered in the drilling of any borehole for natural gas or oil, casing shall be set upon the next formation encountered which is of such a nature that it will sustain the casing and exclude all water from the lower borehole.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 376, § 35.

C.L.

§ 3648.

CSA:

C. 118, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-5.

34-61-106. Application of article.

This article shall apply only to wells or boreholes which may be drilled through workable coal seams.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 376, § 38.

C.L.

§ 3651.

CSA:

C. 118, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-6.

34-61-107. Enforcement of law.

It is the duty of the district attorneys in their districts, and the attorney general in cases where the district attorney refuses to act, to enforce the provisions of this article by appropriate actions in courts of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 646, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-7.

34-61-108. Violation - penalty - disposition of fines.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article 61 commits a class 2 misdemeanor. In all cases where fines are collected, one-half of the amount shall be paid to the treasury department and be placed to the credit of the general fund.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 646, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 100-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-3-8.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3276, § 614, effective March 1, 2022.